Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 11. Derivative Actions

Severability. —

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 5, provides: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 1395 to 1401.

68 C.J.S. Partnership §§ 437 to 439.

§ 17-14-1101.
Right of action.

A limited partner may bring an action in the right of a limited partnership to recover a judgment in its favor if general partners with authority to do so have refused to bring the action or if an effort to cause those general partners to bring the action is not likely to succeed.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

Demand futility.—

Limited partners could satisfy the demand rule by pleading futility because subsequent to the withdrawal of the sole general partner, the partnership agreement required the limited partnership to dissolve, wind up, and then terminate; after the general partner’s death, therefore, the limited partnership entered dissolution without a general partner, making the limited partners’ effort to cause the general partner to bring the action unlikely to succeed. Fritchel v. White, 2019 WY 117, 452 P.3d 601,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2019).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of limited partner to maintain derivative action on behalf of partnership, 26 ALR4th 264.

§ 17-14-1102.
Proper plaintiff.

In a derivative action, the plaintiff shall be a partner at the time of bringing the action and:

At the time of the transaction of which he complains; or

His status as a partner had devolved upon him by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person who was a partner at the time of the transaction.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-14-1103.
Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall set forth with particularity the effort of the plaintiff to secure initiation of the action by a general partner or the reasons for not making the effort.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 17-14-1104.
Expenses.

If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise or settlement of an action or claim, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, and shall direct him to remit to the limited partnership the remainder of those proceeds received by him.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

Attorney's fees. —

It was not error to award a limited partner attorney's fees because the partner succeeded, in part, on a derivative claim brought on the partnership's behalf. Wallop Canyon Ranch, LLC v. Goodwyn, 2015 WY 81, 351 P.3d 943,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2015).